District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “D.C. Income and Franchise Tax Conformity and Revision Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended as follows:
(1) The section designation for section 47-1803.03 is amended to read as follows:
“47-1803.03. Gross income — Corporation, financial institution, unincorporated
business, and partnership deductions.”.
(2) A new section designation is added to read as follows:
“47-1803.04. Gross income — Individual, estate, and trust deductions.”.
(3) The section designation for section 47-1806.02 is amended to read as follows:
“47-1806.02. Tax on residents and nonresidents — Personal exemptions. [Repealed].”.
(b) Section 47-1801.04 is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A)(A) “Basic standard deduction” means:
“(i) For the taxable year ending December 31, 2025:
“(I) In the case of a return filed by a single individual or
married individual filing a separate return, $15,000;
“(II) In the case of a return filed by a head of household,
$22,500; and
“(III) In the case of a return filed by married individuals
filing a joint return, separate on a combined return, or a surviving spouse, $30,000; and
“(ii) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(I) In the case of a return filed by a single individual or
married individual filing a separate return, $15,000, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of-
living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $50, rounded down to the
next multiple of $50);
“(II) In the case of a return filed by a head of household,
$22,500, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not
result in a multiple of $50, rounded down to the next multiple of $50); and
“(III) In the case of a return filed by married individuals
filing a joint return, separate on a combined return, or a surviving spouse, $30,000 increased
annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple
of $50, rounded down to the next multiple of $50).
“(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “cost-of-living adjustment”
shall have the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (11) of this section; except, that the term
“base year” shall mean the calendar year beginning January 1, 2025, or the calendar year
beginning one calendar year before the calendar year in which the new dollar amount of the basic
standard deduction shall become effective, whichever is later.”.
(2) Paragraph (11)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “of this section or §§ 47-
1806.02(f)(1)(A) and (i)” and inserting the phrase “of this section” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (44) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”
(iii) A new sub-subparagraph (v) is added to read as follows:
“(v) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, the term
“standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(i) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(iii) A new sub-subparagraph (v) is added to read as follows:
“(v) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, the term
“standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(C) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase
“married individuals” and inserting the phrase “married individuals or registered domestic
partners” in its place.
(ii) Sub-subparagraph (iii) is amended by striking the phrase “; or”
and inserting a semicolon in its place.
(iii) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended to read as follows:
“(iv) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, but
before January 1, 2025, the standard deduction as prescribed in section 63(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986; or”
(iv) A new sub-sub-subparagraph (v) is added to read as follows:
“(v) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, the term
“standard deduction” means the sum of:
“(I) The basic standard deduction as defined in paragraph
(3A) of this section; and
“(II) The additional standard deduction as prescribed in
section 63(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(c) Section 47-1803.02(a) is amended by adding new paragraphs (1B) and (1C) to read as
follows:
“(1B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, individuals, estates,
and trusts who did not elect to itemize shall include any income deducted or otherwise excluded
pursuant to § 170(p) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for that taxable year.
“(1C) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, individuals, estates
and trusts shall include any income or gain excluded from their federal gross income pursuant to
§ 1202(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for that taxable year.”.
(d) Section 47-1803.03 is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-1803.03. Gross income — Corporation, financial institution, unincorporated
business, and partnership deductions.”.
(2) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) Expenses. — All the ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during
the taxable year in carrying on any trade or business which are deductible under the provisions of
§ 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; except, that:
“(A) For tax years beginning after December 31, 2021, the deduction
allowed for domestic research and experimental expenditures under § 174A of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986 shall be:
“(i) Charged to the capital account; and
“(ii) Allowed as an amortization deduction of such expenditures
ratably over the 5-year period beginning with the midpoint of the taxable year in which such
expenditures are paid or incurred;
“(B) No taxpayer shall be allowed the election to amend a tax return
pursuant to § 174A(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(C) No taxpayer shall be allowed the election under § 174A(f)(2) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986.”.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Interest. — All interest paid or accrued within the taxable year on
indebtedness which is deductible under the provisions of § 163 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986; except, that:
“(A) In computing the limitation on business interest, as allowed under §
163 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, “adjusted taxable income” means the adjusted taxable
income determined under § 163(j)(8)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; except, that §
163(j)(8)(A)(v) shall not apply; and
“(B) “Floor plan financing interest”, as defined under § 163(j)(9) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall not apply.”.
(C) The lead-in language of paragraph (4)(A) is amended by striking the
phrase “Losses sustained during the taxable year and not compensated for by insurance or
otherwise:” and inserting the phrase “Losses sustained during the taxable year and not
compensated for by insurance or otherwise which are deductible under the provisions of § 165 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986:” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (7) is amended to read as follows:
“(7)(A) Depreciation. — A reasonable allowance for exhaustion, wear, and tear of
property used in the trade or business, including a reasonable allowance for obsolescence, and
including in the case of natural resources, allowances for depletion as permitted by reasonable
rules that the Chief Financial Officer may promulgate. The basis upon which such allowances
are to be computed shall be the basis provided for in § 47-1811.04.
“(B) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph:
“(i) No deduction shall be allowed for the special depreciation
allowance under § 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) There shall be allowed as a deduction for the cost of property
elected to be treated as not chargeable to capital account under § 179 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 an amount of equal to the lesser of $25,000 or the actual cost of the property for
the year the property is placed in service;
“(iii) No deduction shall be allowed for the special depreciation
allowance under § 168(n) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(iv) A depreciation deduction may be allowed for an investor in a
shared equity financing agreement as provided in § 47-3507.”.
(E) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “For purposes of this
section, the term “actually paid”, when used with reference to the District of Columbia, includes
compensation waived under § 1-611.15.” and inserting the phrase “For purposes of this section,
the term “actually paid”, when used with reference to the District of Columbia, includes
compensation waived under § 1-611.15, and no charitable contributions may be carried forward
under this paragraph.” in its place.
(F) Paragraph (18)(A) is amended by striking the phrase “section 179 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986” and inserting the phrase “§ 179 of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986” in its place.
(G) Paragraph (20) is amended follows:
(i) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “Capital
Gains” and inserting the phrase “Qualified Opportunity Fund Capital Gains” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the semicolon and
inserting a period in its place.
(iii) Subparagraph (B) is amended as follows:
(I) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(II) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as
follows:
“(ii) For amounts invested in a QOF after December 31, 2026, the
reduction of capital gains tax liability through a 10% step-up basis, if invested in a QOF for 5
years, pursuant to § 1400Z-2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be realized only if
the taxpayer invests in a QOF that meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of this
paragraph.”.
(iv) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(I) The existing text is designated as sub-subparagraph (i).
(II) A new sub-subparagraph (ii) is added to read as
follows:
“(ii) For amounts invested in a QOF after December 31, 2026, the
abatement of capital gains tax on an investment of capital gains held in a QOF for at least 10
years, pursuant to § 1400Z-2(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, shall be realized only if
the taxpayer invests in a QOF that meets the criteria set forth in subparagraph (D) of this
paragraph.”.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(3) Subsections (b), (b-1), (b-2), (b-3), and (b-4) are repealed.
(4) Subsection (d)(6) is amended to read as follows:
“(6) Expenses incurred to produce income which is either exempt or not subject to
taxation under this chapter.”.
(5) Subsection (e) is repealed.
(e) A new section 47-1803.04 is added to read as follows:
“§ 47-1803.04. Gross income — Individual, estate, and trust deductions.
“(a) Deductions allowed — Generally.
“(1) Individuals. An individual is allowed either the standard deduction or
itemized deductions (including the additional deductions set forth in subsection (e) of this
section, if applicable) as set forth in this section.
“(2) Estates and Trusts. An estate or trust is allowed the itemized deductions
(including the additional deductions set forth in subsection (e) of this section, if applicable) and
any deductions allowed under § 47-1809.05.
“(b) Standard deduction. If an individual elects to claim the standard deduction on the
individual’s federal income tax return, the individual must claim the standard deduction as
defined in § 47-1801.04(44), and no itemized deductions and other additions to the standard
deduction are allowed, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. If an individual elects to
claim any itemized deductions on the individual’s federal return, the individual must claim the
itemized deductions as allowed under this section and the standard deduction is not allowed. For
married individuals or domestic partners, if the net income of one of the spouses or registered
domestic partners is determined by itemizing deductions on a separate return, neither of the
spouses or registered domestic partners is allowed the standard deduction.
“(c) Itemized deductions.
“(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, in computing net income, an
individual, estate, or trust is allowed the following deductions:
“(A) Any deduction allowed under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
and to the same extent, on a federal individual or fiduciary income tax return; except, that a
deduction for state or local taxes under § 164 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (except as
otherwise provided in subsection (d)(1) and (2) of this section) is allowed without regard to the
applicable limitation amounts set forth in § 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(2)(A) In the case of an individual whose District of Columbia adjusted gross
income exceeds the applicable amount, the amount of the itemized deductions otherwise
allowable for the taxable year shall be reduced by 5% of the excess of the District of Columbia
adjusted gross income over the applicable amount.
“(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term:
“(i) “Applicable amount” means $200,000 ($100,000, married
filing separately); and
“(ii) “Itemized deductions” does not include the deduction:
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(I) Under § 213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986
relating to expenses such as, for example, medical or dental;
“(II) For investment interest, as defined in § 163(d) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(III) Under § 165(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, for casualty or theft losses described in § 165(c)(2) and (3) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, or for losses described in § 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(C) This subsection shall be applied after the application of any other
limitation on the allowance of any itemized deduction.
“(D) This subsection shall not apply to any estate or trust.
“(d) Deductions not allowed. No deductions shall be allowed for the following:
“(1) Income taxes;
“(2) Franchise taxes imposed by this chapter;
“(3) S corporation income. Any deduction passing to a stockholder in a small
business corporation as defined in § 1371 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, making an
election under § 1372(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, or an S Corporation as defined in
§ 1361(a) and (b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, making an election under § 1362(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, that is otherwise deductible under the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section and that was allowable in determining the taxable income of the
small business corporation or S Corporation subject to tax under the provisions of subchapter VII
of this chapter;
“(4) Qualified business income. A deduction allowed under § 63(b)(3) or § 199A
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(5) Business deductions. Any deduction not allowed under § 47-1803.03 or in
excess of a deduction allowed but limited under § 47-1803.03;
“(6) Qualified tips. Any deduction allowed for qualified tips under § 224 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(7) Qualified overtime compensation. A deduction allowed for qualified
overtime compensation under § 225 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;
“(8) Personal car loan interest. Any deduction for personal car loan interest
allowed under § 163(h)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(9) Senior deduction. Any deduction for an enhanced senior deduction allowed
under § 151(d)(5)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(e) Additional deductions allowed. The following additional deductions are allowed as
deductions from gross income in computing net income of any individual, estate, or trust, as the
case may be:
“(1) Classroom teacher expenses.
“(A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2006, an individual
who has been a classroom teacher in a public school or public charter school in the District of
Columbia for the entire year for which the individual is filing or for the entire year prior to the
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
year for which the individual is filing and is approved for teaching by the District of Columbia
Public Schools may deduct from gross income:
“(i) The amount the individual paid during the year for basic
classroom materials and supplies necessary for teaching; provided, that the deduction shall not
exceed $500 per year, per individual, whether the individual files individually or jointly; and
“(ii) The amount the individual paid during the year as tuition and
fees for post-graduate education, professional development, or state licensing examination and
testing required for, or related to, improving teacher credentials or maintaining professional
certification; provided, that the deduction shall not exceed $1,500 per year, per individual,
whether the individual files individually or jointly.
“(B) The deductions under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not be
allowed to the extent the same expenses were claimed by the individual in computing federal
adjusted gross income for the same taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code 1986.
“(2) Capital Gains from a Qualified Opportunity Fund. The capital gains
deduction for investing in a qualified opportunity fund in the same manner as set forth in § 47-
1803.03(a)(20).
(f) Section 47-1805.02 is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “Every nonresident of the
District receiving income subject to tax pursuant to this chapter and every resident of the District,
except a fiduciary, who is required to file a federal return under the provisions of § 6012 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986.” and inserting the phrase “Every individual having for the
taxable year, gross income which equals or exceeds the applicable basic standard deduction as
defined under § 47-1801.04(3A).” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Every fiduciary of a trust that has gross income of $100 or more for
the taxable year; and”.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) Every fiduciary of an estate that has gross income of $1 or more for
the taxable year.”.
(C) Subparagraphs (C) and (D) are repealed.
(g) Section 47-1806.01 is amended by striking the phrase “in excess of the personal
exemptions and credits for dependents allowed by § 47-1806.02 and” and inserting the phrase
“in excess of” in its place.
(h) Section 47-1806.02 is repealed.
(i) Section 47-1806.04 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (c)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “after December
31, 1988,” and inserting the phrase “after December 31, 1988, but before January 1, 2025,” in its
place.
(C) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B) If a return is filed for a full calendar or fiscal year beginning after
December 31, 2025, an individual who incurs household and dependent care services necessary
to engage in gainful employment and who is allowed a credit under § 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, shall be allowed, against the tax imposed by this chapter for the taxable year, an
amount equal to 24.25% of the credit allowed under § 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
regardless of the amount of the credit actually used to offset federal tax liability.”.
(2) Subsection (f)(1) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (B-2) is amended by striking the figure “85%” and
inserting the figure “100%” in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B-3) is repealed.
(j) Section 47-1806.17 is revived as of October 1, 2024, and amended to read as follows:
“§ 47-1806.17. Child tax credit.
“(a) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, there shall be allowed a credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter for each qualifying child of the taxpayer for which the
taxpayer is allowed a deduction under § 151 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(b)(1) The amount of the credit shall be calculated as follows:
“(A) For the taxable year beginning January 1, 2026, $1,000 for each
qualifying child who has not reached the age of 18 years by December 31, 2025; and
“(B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, $1,000 for
each qualifying child who has not reached the age of 18 years by December 31 of the taxable
year, increased annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not
result in a multiple of $5, rounded down to the next multiple of $5).
“(2) The amount of the credit shall be reduced by $50 for each $1,000 (or fraction
thereof) by which the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income exceeds the threshold amount; except,
that the reductions cannot reduce the credit below zero.
“(3) In the case of a return made for a fractional part of a taxable year, the credit
allowable under this section shall be reduced to an amount that bears the same ratio to the full
credit provided as the number of months in the period for which the return is made to 12 months.
“(c) The credit claimed under this section in a taxable year may exceed the taxpayer’s tax
liability under this subchapter for that taxable year and shall be refundable to the taxpayer
claiming the credit. Any refunds paid to the taxpayer pursuant to this section shall not be
considered income for the purpose of determining eligibility for or benefit amount of public
assistance.
“(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a taxpayer shall not be eligible
to receive a credit if:
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The taxpayer does not claim the qualifying child as a dependent on the
taxpayer’s federal and District income tax returns for that taxable year; or
“(2) The taxpayer was not a resident of the District for the entire calendar year
preceding the year in which a claim for this credit is filed.
“(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Base year” means the calendar year beginning January 1, 2026, or the
calendar year beginning one calendar year before the calendar year in which the new dollar
amount of the credit amount or eligibility income threshold amount shall become effective,
whichever is later.
“(2) “Consumer Price Index” means the average of the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers for the Washington-Arlington-Alexandria DC-MD-VA-WV Metropolitan
Statistical Area (or such successor metropolitan statistical area that includes the District), or any
successor index, as of the close of the 12-month period ending on July 31 of such calendar year.
“(3) Cost-of-living adjustment” means an amount, for any calendar year, equal to
a dollar amount set forth in this section multiplied by the difference between the Consumer Price
Index for the preceding calendar year and the Consumer Price Index for the base year, divided by
the Consumer Price Index for the base year.
“(4) “Dependent” shall have the same meaning as set forth under § 152 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(5) “Qualifying child” shall have the same meaning as set forth under § 152(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
“(6) “Threshold amount” means the adjusted gross income reported on the
taxpayer’s return in the following amounts:
“(A) For the taxable year beginning January 1, 2026:
“(i) $55,000 in the case of an unmarried individual filing as single,
head of household, or qualifying widow(er);
“(ii) $70,000 in the case of married individuals or registered
domestic partners filing either jointly or separately on a combined return; or
“(iii) $35,000 in the case of an individual filing as married filing
separately.
“(B) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, increased
annually pursuant to the cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple
of $100, rounded down to the next multiple of $100):
“(i) $55,000 in the case of an unmarried individual filing as single,
head of household, or qualifying widow(er);
“(ii) $70,000 in the case of married individuals or registered
domestic partners filing either jointly or separately on a combined return; or
“(iii) $35,000 in the case of an individual filing as married filing
separately.”.
(k) Section 47-1809.05 is amended as follows:
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “except as to the
personal exemptions and credits for dependents, and except that:” and inserting the phrase
“except that:” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “creating the trust;” and
inserting the phrase “creating the trust; and” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (4) is repealed.
(l) Section 47-1811.04 is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “§ 47-1803.03(a)(7)
and (b-3)” and inserting the phrase “§§ 47-1803.03(a)(7) and 47-1803.04(e)(3)” in its place
(2) New paragraphs (3) and (4) are added to read as follows:
“(3) The amount of special depreciation allowance under section 168(n) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and
“(4) A depreciation deduction may be allowed for an investor in a shared equity
financing agreement as provided in § 47-3507.”.
(m) Section 47-1812.08 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “the Council of the District of Columbia” and insert
the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “the Mayor” both times it appears and insert the
phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(C) Strike the phrase “5% of” and insert the phrase “the highest applicable
rate of tax set forth in § 47-1806.03 applied to” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and
inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place
(B) Paragraph (1A) is amended to read as follows:
“(1A) For the purposes of this subsection, the terms “allowance” and “exemption”
shall have the same meaning.”.
(C) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(i) The lead-in language of subparagraph (D) is amended by
striking the phrase “The Council of the District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “The
Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(ii) Subparagraph (E) is repealed.
(3) Subsection (c)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “the Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(4) Subsection (e) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and
inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and
inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(C) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “the Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(D) A new paragraph (8A) is added to read as follows:
“(8A) For periods beginning after December 31, 2017, an employee shall be
entitled to additional withholding exemptions under this subsection with respect to payment of
wages equal to the employee’s estimated itemized deductions divided by an amount promulgated
by the Chief Financial Officer.”.
(E) The lead-in language of paragraph (9) is amended by striking the
phrase “the Mayor” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(F) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” both
times it appears and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(5) Subsection (f)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” wherever it
appears and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(6) Subsection (g) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (1)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “the Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “The Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “The Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(7) Subsection (h) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and inserting
the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(8) Subsection (i) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraph (2)(D) is amended by striking the phrase “the Council of
the District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “the Mayor” and
inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “the Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(D) The lead-in language of paragraph (6) is amended by striking the
phrase “the Council of the District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “the Chief Financial
Officer” in its place.
(E) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “The Council of the
District of Columbia” and inserting the phrase “The Chief Financial Officer” in its place.
(9) Subsection (k) is amended by striking the phrase “of one and one half percent
per month” and inserting the phrase “set forth in § 47-4201” in its place.
Sec. 3. Conforming Amendments.
(a) The Child Tax Credit Amendment Act of 2025, enacted on September 4, 2025 (D.C.
Act 26-148; 72 DCR 9825), is repealed.
(b) The Child Tax Credit Emergency Amendment Act of 2025, effective September 3,
2025 (D.C. Act 26-146; 72 DCR 9623), is repealed.
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c) The Child Tax Credit Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2025,
effective November 24, 2025 (D.C. Act 26-210; 72 DCR ____), is repealed.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
Except as otherwise provided, this act shall apply as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
13